Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL OF DENTISTRY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $100,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to predesign, design, renovate, construct, furnish and equip clinical, teaching, research, and administrative spaces, and other improvements of a capital nature for the School of Dentistry on the Twin Cities campus. This appropriation includes money for site preparation, hazardous materials abatement, and the relocation or expansion of related utility infrastructure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin University share. new text end new text begin The appropriation in this section is intended to cover approximately two-thirds of the costs of this project. The remaining project costs must be paid from university sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $100,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end